Utah statutes.
4-25-1.   Definition.

For the purpose of this chapter "estray" means any unbranded sheep, cattle, horses, mules, or asses found running at large, or any branded sheep, cattle, horses, mules, or asses found running at large whose owner cannot be found after reasonable search, or any swine found running at large whose owner cannot be found after reasonable search; but it does not mean nor include any unweaned animal specified in this section that is running with its mother.

